Authors
Dave Cowen
Number of Reviews
15

Title
Review for Safe (1995)
Engaging Characters and Strong Acting Almost Make Up
For a Plot That Goes Nowhere, Fast 
THE most surprising thing about The Devil's Own is certainly not the
plot, which in terms of predictability often places somewhere between
sunrise and taxes. Instead, the greatest surprise is the very fact that
this rumored Hollywood disaster, this IRA version of Heaven's Gate, a
film which seemed destined to become known as MacIshtar, is actually
not that bad after all. With two weeks to go before its March 26th
release, The Devil's Own has long been considered dead on arrival.
Reports of the film's demise have been widespread, beginning with the
shooting of the film in New York last summer and climaxing dramatically
in late January with public denunciations by one of the film's two
leading men, Brad Pitt.
"Twenty pages of dogshit," was Pitt's recollection of the Devil's Own
script, as told to Newsweek.
"[The Devil's Own] was the most irresponsible bit of filmmaking -- if
you can even call it that -- that I've ever seen. I couldn't believe
it. I don't know why anyone would want to continue making that movie."
In addition to Mr. Pitt's complaints were the howls of Hollywood
journalists, horrified by The Devil's Own many delays, script rewrites,
and most of all, budget figures.
"The budget has soared from an estimated sixty million dollars to
ninety million," reported The New Yorker, almost four months and surely
another few million dollars ago, in November. The gossip columnists'
condemnation of director Alan Pakula's spending habits were such that
one would think the money was theirs. Haven't there been plenty of
on-set disasters which turned out to on-screen classics? What about
Apocalypse Now? Wasn't that film also a mess before it was recognized
as a great?
Yes, but of course that hardly means there will be a Hearts of Darkness
made about The Devil's Own. The IRA thriller is a greatly flawed mess
in search of an ending. It will most definitely be slated by the
critics and will be very lucky to break even. But as stated above, it's
not our money....
THE film begins in 1972 in a rural cottage outside Belfast, where we
see young Frankie McGuire listening to his dad, who is saying Grace.
The potatoes are still warm when the door is kicked in by men in
balaclavas, guns blazing. Frankie's eyes are frozen as his father --
whom we hear later was some form of republican sympathizer -- is gunned
down by the unidentified gunmen.
The incident is all young Frankie needs to become, within the next 20
years, the most feared of IRA weapons. A closed-door strategy meeting
among security force officials reveals as much -- the adult terrorist,
McGuire, must be brought down at all costs, the troops are informed.
Just as the 1972 killing of his father was all McGuire needed to forge
a life of mayhem, so too is that life of mayhem all the British Army
and Northern Ireland police need to custom-order the assassination of
McGuire. A policy of shoot-to-kill is put into effect.
As the twenty something McGuire, Pitt is a quietly seething force. With
the confidence and bravery known only to leading men, McGuire is a
daredevil in Belfast fire-fights, though all around him his IRA buddies
are shot to bits. "Where's Frankie McGuire?," hisses a menacing British
army agent, immediately recalling the "Where's Sean?" mantra of an
earlier IRA movie, 1992's Patriot Games.
Unlike Patriot Games, the IRA man in The Devil's Own is portrayed as
justified in his actions and decent in his intentions, although his
mission is ultimately more important than the human lives of even those
close to him. Frankie McGuire is shown to have friends and also to have
affection, but he'll gladly detonate both if the need arises.
This is evident when we next meet McGuire, on a missile-purchasing
mission in New York, in the spring of 1993.
"Isn't this crazy?," says McGuire's increasingly unsure IRA buddy,
played by Paul Ronan. "Us trying so hard to bring missiles over there,
and them only waiting to shoot us?"
Phelan makes a brief attempt at talking McGuire out of it all:  peace
is in the air; we'll only be killed and forgotten; and besides, isn't
New York a wonderful place? But McGuire, as determined as any Hollywood
heavy, brushes him off and sets out to buy some missiles.
Alan Pakula, the Devil's Own director, obviously felt it necessary to
justify his IRA character's actions even beyond the 1972 death of
Frankie McGuire's father. McGuire is shown entering Newark Airport on
February 23, 1993, a date which is surely no coincidence. In real-life
-- but not mentioned in the movie -- the date is exactly three weeks
after the first-ever U.S.  visit by republican leader Gerry Adams. It
was a grim time for Northern Ireland supporters of the IRA, which would
not declare a ceasefire for several more bloody months, on September
1st. In February, there were many within the IRA who were urging peace,
leading to the ceasefire six months later, but (the fictional) Frankie
McGuire was surely not one of them.
"If we could only take one of them down," laments McGuire, referring to
the flocks of Army helicopters over Northern Ireland. "Then we'd get
them to listen."
(Obviously, the Devil's Own screenwriters did their homework in this
regard -- judging by the real-life busts of IRA gun-running missions
over the past two decades, surface-to-air missiles has been a
priority.)
McGuire appropriates the name of 'Rory Devaney' (though for some reason
he doesn't bother with a disguise or even a haircut) and enters a
familiar network of sympathetic Irish Americans. Chief among them is a
wealthy and powerful judge, played by George Hearn, who is involved in
a 'Project Children'-type effort connecting wayward and unemployed
Irish youths with generous American families. New York Police sergeant
Tom O'Meara (Harrison Ford), as a favor to his old friend the judge,
allows 'Rory Devaney' to crash in the basement of his suburban home.
Unknown to the O'Meara family, the judge is something other than a
benevolent Project Children type and 'Rory Devaney' is more than an
unemployed youth in need of a start. The judge provides a sack full of
fresh hundreds, and it's McGuire/Devaney's job to convert them into
dead helicopters.
It is in the O'Meara household that Devil's Own has its finest moments.
Harrison Ford plays a veteran cop in a house full of females -- his
wife, Sheila, (played by Margaret Colin) and their three daughters,
aged approximately five, eleven and perhaps fourteen. The three
daughters immediately fall in love with this mysterious
basement-dweller with the funny accent, providing some genuinely
touching domestic scenes, thankfully free of Hollywood cutesiness.
Sergeant O'Meara's high school-aged daughter is mortified when the
youngest child asks 'Devaney' at the dinner table whether he has a
girlfriend. The tension is delightfully real; tellingly, the drama over
corned beef and cabbage is much more effective than that which takes
place later, over Stingers and AK-47s.
As the Provo-beneath-the-stairs, McGuire moves quickly in acquiring the
goods. A plan is hatched to buy missiles from a shadowy Irish American
businessman, Billy Burke (played by Treat Williams), who toasts dead
Fenians in his shamrocked Manhattan saloon (locals will recognize the
set as the historic Old Town tavern). It is evident from the beginning
-- especially to Frankie McGuire -- that Billy Burke's loyalties are
closer to his own wallet. Without getting into specifics and giving
away too much of the plot, trouble begins when the visiting IRA men
fall afoul of the local Irish American mobsters. Frankie McGuire is
loyal to a fault, but his mobbed-up ethnic cousins are as reliable as
the weather.
Thus also begins the unraveling of the relationship between McGuire and
Sgt. O'Meara. There is much for O'Meara to question at this point in
his middle-aged life: the sudden realization that his NYPD partner --
played by Ruben Blades -- as well as the Irish kid in the basement, are
something other than what was advertised. The NYPD angle is merely a
distraction though, as O 'Meara copes with the newly-discovered
identity of the son he never had. It is here that the bottom starts to
fall out of The Devil's Own. Sgt.  O'Meara's loyalties and motivations
are all over the place, as if, well, as if they were taken from several
different screenplays.  The movie stumbles on to an end which is, at
best, anti-climactic, but not before Alan Pakula's production allows
the audience a little bit of fun.
For instance, there is the emergence on U.S. soil of a British Army
agent, identified by Harrison Ford's character as a member of the
S.A.S., or Special Air Service. In a characterization which will surely
make the London tabloids howl in protest, this character is slightly
less charming than Darth Vader. We have already seen him coldly
assassinate an already-wounded member of Frankie McGuire's IRA unit in
Belfast, and it is made clear that he is in the U.S. to do the same to
Frankie McGuire.
"We have already gotten everyone else in his unit," explains the SAS
agent, suggesting that McGuire's unit has resisted the rest of the
IRA's move toward peace. Sergeant O'Meara, although he disagrees
strongly with armed republicanism and is repulsed when he learns of
McGuire's involvement, nonetheless decides not to help the British
agent. This leads to a memorable confrontation between the snarling spy
from London and the narrowback cop from Brooklyn.
"What exactly is your relationship to Frankie McGuire?," snarls the
agent. "After all, you are Irish, are you not, Sergeant O'Meara?"
O'Meara, livid at the implication, shoots back incredulously, "Yeah,
but so's Cardinal O'Connor."
Politically, The Devil's Own is likely to cause plenty of
problems overseas. There is no mention of Frankie McGuire's
unionist-minded neighbors, which must have seemed okay to
the screenwriters since Frankie McGuire seems to care far
more about military revenge than he does political ideals
(concepts such as partition or re-unification are never
discussed). The only unionist-type we meet in the entire movie
is the above-mentioned SAS agent. As regards the history of
American involvement in IRA matters, the film is more
accurate and understanding than any of Hollywood's other
recent IRA thrillers (the main ones being Patriot Games and
1994's Blown Away). Bits and pieces of the plot resemble
events in a number of real-life gun-running operations: the
early
1980s Valhalla operation out of Boston, for example, as well
as
the numerous attempts at buying Stingers over the past fifteen
years. More importantly, the character of Sergeant O'Meara
points to a depth previously unseen for his stereotype -- the
character is Irish American, somewhat sentimental, and is also
a blue-collar member of the New York City police force. Yet
this does not make him a de facto supporter of the IRA. At the
same time, neither is O'Meara blindly condemning of the IRA.
Harrison Ford's character, while disagreeing strongly with
armed republicanism, states how he understands the
anger-fueled motivations of republicans like McGuire. "Can't
they get the bastards?" O'Meara asks Frankie, referring to the
men who killed the senior McGuire, in 1972.
"They are the bastards," responds Frankie.
There's no other way but to hit them back, asserts McGuire,
and although O'Meara does not agree, he understands. Such
complexity of character, acted by a seasoned, affable
professional such as Harrison Ford, make The Devil's Own
stand out above its IRA-themed predecessors.
Unfortunately, it is not enough. The movie's characters are
eminently engaging for the first 60% of the film, before the
plot
is pulled from beneath them like a rug. The film's ends with a
dud, when it clearly needed a bang, and is ultimately less
than
satisfying.
Which begs the question: it is possible for the Hollywood to
make a meaningful, character-driven IRA-themed story and
simultaneously deliver a sophisticated thriller? The jury is
still
out on that one. For better or for worse, the real-life
material
which inspires stories such as The Devil's Own will be around
long after this movie has gone to video.
From esch@fische.com Wed Mar 19 09:02:18 EST 1997
Article: 5453 of rec.arts.movies.reviews
Path: nntphub.cb.lucent.com!not-for-mail
From: esch@fische.com (Dave Cowen)
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Subject: RETROSPECTIVE: SAFE (1995)
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.past-films
Date: 18 Mar 1997 17:01:09 GMT
Organization: Exec-PC
Lines: 244
Sender: eleeper@lucent.com (Evelyn C. Leeper)
Approved: eleeper@lucent.com
Message-ID: 
Reply-To: esch@fische.com (Dave Cowen)
NNTP-Posting-Host: mtvoyager.mt.lucent.com
Summary: r.a.m.r. #07132
Keywords: author=Cowen
Originator: ecl@mtvoyager
Xref: nntphub.cb.lucent.com rec.arts.movies.reviews:5453
Status: O
[This review contains what some may consider spoilers.  However, I feel 
 that these observations on the film could enhance the movie for first-time 
 viewers as well.  Read on at your own discretion.]
It's a natural human instinct to attribute cause, and when none is available,
to fill in the blanks with unfounded speculations that can be recited as 
simple truths.  At its most harmless, this human reaction to the unknown
results in superstition or meaningless legends, but at worst can engulf an 
individual with a sense of paranoia and the belief in conspiracy.  When an 
individual feels that there is no answer to a fundamental question of human 
existence, or even worse, the "meaning of life," that individual either 
shrinks into depression or, if lucky, relies on a strong community or family 
to help them through their crisis of the soul.  Unfortunately, the human 
animal has a tendency for gullibility in times of crisis, and can be easily 
lured into a community which masquerading as being there to help, is really 
there for another reason.  
The central irony of Todd Haynes' film SAFE is that Carol White (Julianne 
Moore), the film's main character, is in a position that many would consider 
to be more safe in life than any other in our society.  A housewife in the San 
Fernando Valley during the late 80's, Carol spends her days decorating, 
carpooling, doing aerobics and 'fruit diets'.  She has a husband with an 
advancing career, a stepson, a large European auto, and most of all, a 
spacious house protected by a huge metal gate.  Carol personifies the 
housewife we've all imagined as being the female component of an 'American 
dream family'.  What could possibly go wrong?
Things start to change.  Carol begins having headaches, sleeplessness, 
sensitivity to smell.  She has a coughing fit after driving behind a 
dumptruck, and later we find Carol hyperventilating while attending a 
friend's baby shower.  Repeated visits to the doctor leaves the doctor with 
the impression that Carol's symptoms are stress related, which results in a 
referral to a psychologist.  A visit to the psychologist yields little gain, 
however, when the psychologist tells Carol  "We really need to be hearing from 
you.  What's going on inside -you-," and Carol finds she has little to say.
When Carol speaks she speaks in fragments, as if she can not quite verbalize 
an idea.  Carol ends her fragments with question marks -- when asked if she 
has children, Carol responds "he's not my son, he's my stepson?  Rory?"  And
if questioned in an aggressive manner, or accused of something, she'll let out
a defensive "I just...", pause for a few seconds, and say something else.  
When a waitress asks "Do you know what you want," the best Carol can do is to 
say "I'll have what she's having."  Carol is not a woman who is in control of 
her life.  
After a draining aerobics session, Carol finds a flyer hanging on a bulletin 
board at the health club labeled DO YOU SMELL FUMES?  Carol starts attending 
seminars on chemical sensitivity, reacts during an allergy test, and becomes 
convinced that she is suffering from environmental illness.  Carol begins a 
regimen to combat the illness, fasting, popping vitamin pills, creating a 
"safe place" in her home, and carrying an oxygen tank.
A grand mal seizure in a dry cleaning shop sends Carol to the hospital, where
on TV she sees an infomercial for Wrenwood, a getaway for environmentally ill 
individuals which labels itself a "safe haven for troubled times".  Carol goes 
to Wrenwood, run by the leader Peter Dunning (described in the film as a 
"chemically sensitive man with AIDS") who preaches that self-help and optimism 
will help chemically sensitive people overcome their problems.  Peter, a 
charismatic speaker who lives on an extravagant house seen on a nearby hill, 
has a mantra for attendees at his center: "We are safe, and all is well in our 
world."  Carol seems to feel at home in this community, but her condition 
worsens, and ends up in a small, porcelin-lined and ventilated igloo.  
What most viewers of SAFE have found daunting, exasperating, or have missed 
entirely is the fact that SAFE is not only an exploration of the impossibility 
of establishing a cause to all things, but also a satire played with a poker 
face. Imagine watching Dr. Strangelove with the sound turned off -- one would 
likely consider themselves to be watching a straightforward war film, and 
without paying attention to SAFE, the film seems to have vacuous characters, 
not characters that are being mocked for their vacuity.  The late 80's 
conservative lifestyle is spoofed at every chance, from the Billy Ocean 
songs on the radio to Carol's reaction to being delivered the wrong color
of couch.  While many complain that SAFE is boring because nothing happens, 
nearly every scene contains a hint, or at best a red herring, which is 
absolutely essential in understanding the film. In fact, SAFE is a mystery
comprised entirely of clues that may be considered red herrings.
"We are safe, and all is well in our world."
I mention, at the beginning of the review, that it is natural for we as 
humans to assign cause to unknown things.  It is nearly impossible, therefore, 
for the viewer to not watch SAFE and construct the clues present into a 
hypothesis as to why she is becoming ill.  It is common for a viewer to take 
the stance that Carol is genuinely sick, victim of chemicals in the air of 
everyday life, or that it is completely psychosomatic, but I propose something 
slightly different in this review.
The second scene in the film is a sex scene, portraying Carol's husband Greg 
(Xander Berkeley) in the throes of passion.  We see Carol's face, impartial, 
beneath his back and his head, waiting patiently for him to finish.  When he 
is done, she gives him a chaste kiss and a pat on the back.  
Soon after, we find Carol wandering through her house, through the kitchens, 
where the painters are painting.  Carol asks for a glass of milk, falls down, 
and then sits at the table, taking sip after sip.  The camera pans back and
zooms in at the same time, giving a feeling of spaciousness and expansion to 
the scene.  The space around Carol feels more and more empty as she is 
dissociated from her environment.
Later in the film, we find Carol and Greg at a client dinner at a high-class 
restaurant, as one of Greg's business associates is telling a dirty joke.  
After the punchline, one of the other wives at the table mentions Carol not 
appreciating her husband's joke.  "Carol!" Greg says suddenly, and the camera 
finds Carol snapping back to attention from having her eyes closed.  "I'm 
sorry, I don't..." she says, pauses, and then mouths the word "sorry" to Greg. 
Carol doesn't... feel well?  Or, perhaps, Carol can't admit she doesn't
like dirty jokes.
Throughout the nights, Carol wanders the yard of her home when she can't 
sleep, caged in by the fence that surrounds the property.  One night, when 
walking through the front yard, she is spotted by the local security company 
and has the spotlight thrown in her face.  She quickly runs back inside the 
house.
Remember that Carol's son is her stepson -- she doesn't have a real son.  
When attending a baby shower, Carol is served something that is "melting all 
over."  When the final present is opened, a baby stroller, Carol begins 
hyperventilating.  Later, when at the allergists, Carol is injected with a 
number of substances that could provoke an allergic reaction.  She begins 
hyperventilating with .1 of 2 milk.  
Later in the film, in one of the film's last scenes, Carol is shown with her 
husband at Wrenwood, as Carol is moving into her porcelin-lined cabin.  Greg 
is walking with her, and then slips his arm around her as though to initiate a 
kiss.  Carol instantly recoils from the touch, walking back about 10 feet, 
claiming that there must be something in his shirt that she's reacting to.  
He then asks if he "at least gets a hug", which she then provides, putting 
her head onto his chest, right on the shirt.
I feel that Carol is faced with a crisis in her life: without having raised a
child, without having a job to do (servants perform all of the work in the 
White household), and without having any responsibilities, Carol has a vacuum 
in her life, a life with no meaning (the cinematography throughout the first 
half of the film frames the characters of the film in their houses in such a 
way to present, on screen, a visual vacuum -- people swallowed by the 
emptiness of their surroundings)  Her husband seems to have little to do with 
her except for sex, which he pressures her for in the film.  She obviously 
doesn't like the advances, and at least once in the film, uses illness as a 
way of rejecting his advances.  Her house seems like a giant cage, and she an 
animal being kept for show.  Carol is caught between not knowing what she 
wants in life, living in a society that does not provide her with any purpose 
in her life, and living in an environment that is not in any way healthy for 
her, whether it be physically or mentally.  What better way to get away then 
to leave to a camp whose bylaws promise not only isolation from chemical 
dangers, but also safety from "casual drug use and sexual interaction" between 
the patients?  Quite a few, perhaps.
"We are safe, and all is well in our world."
If SAFE's first half is a maze of ambiguities and possibilities, the film's
second half does have one clear answer -- that Wrenwood, and the type of tepid 
new-age self-help optimism that is espoused there, is quite clearly corrupt. 
When Peter Dunning explains his ideas to his visitors, he punctuates his 
sentences with the phrase "Does that make sense?"  When he does so, it doesn't 
seem as though he's asking to make sure that he is understood, but is instead 
issuing a threat -- with a defensive tone of voice, the above phrase prevents 
anyone in the camp from challenging him.  When Dunning talks about all of the 
hatred and negativism in the world, his voice changes to a tone that expresses 
hatred and negativism towards that hatred and negativism.  When Dunning tells 
another Wrenwood visitor who expresses disgust at the chemical companies who 
made her environmentally sensitive, Dunning tells her to "Put that gun away!" 
in the most condescending way possible.  He seems to be the perfect new-age 
hypocrite, railing against the anger and hostility in the world
with anger and hostility.  Dunning advocates abandoning the world -- he speaks
about "throwing away" the newspaper and no longer watching TV so that he 
would not have to deal with the kind of messages that those media vehicles 
provide.  But what's the real reason he's recommending doing that?  It's a 
good way of keeping his flock on the farm, within the fenced-in confines
at Wrenwood.  Dunning's house on the hill, Wrenwood's glossy brochure and
extended infomercial is a sure sign that Wrenwood is not a benign not-for-
profit, but an organization intended to keep it's high-ups with a high 
incoming cashflow and a pack of admirers.  Carol has moved from one 
environment that is unhealthy for her to another.
Despite the new dangers present at Wrenwood, Carol is sucked in by the entire 
Wrenwood experience: the staff members there seem to be happy and full of 
life, Dunning's speeches comfort her that all is well in the world, and she 
has found a community, however artificial, where she belongs.  The 
isolationism Dunning proposes, however, has an unwanted after effect --
throughout the second half of the film, Carol's condition grows progressively 
worse.  Carol is literally shrinking.  She seems shy and more girlish, and a 
Texan accent begins to creep into her speech (she mentions earlier in the film
that she is originally from Texas, not California).  By the end of the film, 
when she has moved into the small igloo, with the tube from her oxygen tank 
providing her with "fresh air", she has returned to the womb, defenseless, 
weak, and cared for by a parent that wants nothing more than her money.  Carol 
has become afraid of the world, but instead of teaching Carol the need to take 
an active fight against adversity, either philosophically or medically, 
Wrenwood influences her to recoil into herself.  Wrenwood's philosophy, that 
in order to get better, one has to love one's self, seems like a tiny band-aid 
or placebo pill being used to try and cure a much larger problem.  What, 
ultimately, is that problem?  The vacuity of our society and anxiety over
the often invisible dangers of modern life.  In many other films or TV movies, 
Carol's final words of "I love you," would be a sure sign that all is better.  
In SAFE, that's far from the case.
No one is safe.  And all is not well in our world.  And when we as a society 
don't have proper support to deal intelligently with crises in our lives, what 
we end up seeing are those who are trying to take advantage of us in that 
situation.  The constant advertisements for "psychic help lines," the success 
of the scientologists, and in many cases religion is used to take advantage of 
those with the natural human instinct to question their place in the world or 
to attribute cause, and the fear and uncertainty that results from that.  
Don't be fooled by friends you have to pay for.  SAFE spells out, in a satire 
on the emptiness of American life, just what a mess that can become.  
So how can we possibly cope in a world fraught with danger?  SAFE is a rare 
film in that it does not lie with a simplistic or tidy answer, preferring to 
simply not offer an answer, which is more often than not, the only real answer 
in life.  It may be ambiguous, and it may not be happy, but it sure isn't
a cop-out.
Even if you don't care for what SAFE is saying, it is still a film of much 
merit.  The cinematography is nothing short of striking (see it letterboxed if 
possible, as framing is very important in the context of the film), and the 
sound mix is incredible, where the constant noise of our surroundings becomes 
almost unbearable.  Julianne Moore's performance as Carol is breathtaking: her 
decline in the second half of the film seems truly tragic as Moore's actual 
physical condition deteriorates (Moore lost 10 pounds during the course of the 
film and kept strict diets), and her portrayal of a fragile, empty individual 
is one of the most effective and striking performances seen this decade.
As a side note: for many months after seeing SAFE, I argued with friends about 
the character James LeGros plays at Wrenwood.  Many other viewers were certain 
that he was trying to 'hit on' Carol.  I argued that he wasn't, as I 
considered him to be flamingly gay.  In an interview with Todd Haynes, Haynes 
mentions that Moore and LeGros decided, behind his back, to play LeGros' 
scenes with the idea that his character was Peter Dunning's secret lover.  
Whether gay or not, Haynes has said that he intended for that character to 
start out by appearing that he was 'hitting on' Carol, but ending up as a kind 
of camp counselor.  It's just another interesting thing to keep in mind while 
watching the film.
Signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david
(esch@fische.com) ----------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Heavy (1995)
There's a sad magic in the feelings one experiences in the simple act of 
touching another.  A strange feeling of electricity or a thick feeling of 
ennui can seem to pulse or flow from one body to another, independant it 
seems, of our other senses.  The true magic of viewing a movie is that 
should a film engulf the viewer completely into the lives and minds of the
characters and the situations at hand, the viewer can truly feel as though 
they were experiencing firsthand the chemistry or emotions between the 
characters.
In a scene mid-way through HEAVY, Victor (Pruitt Taylor Vince) approaches 
his co-worker Callie (Liv Tyler) who is buckled over in sadness from a 
comment made by another co-worker, Delores (Debbie Harry).  Victor moves to
Callie slowly and cautiously, and then holds his hand to the side of her 
forehead.  Callie reaches up to hold his hand.  Soon after, as Victor leaves 
the room, he is grabbed by Delores who reaches out and holds him in a very 
similar way.  The difference is, we can _feel_ the longing and sadness of 
Victor and Callie pulse through the brief moment of contact that they make: 
but when Dolores reaches out to Victor, we feel nothing but the cold contact 
of flesh on flesh.  This is due to the fine direction and acting at the heart 
of HEAVY.
Victor is a "mama's boy" who works as a chef in the restaurant owned by his
mother Dollie (Shelley Winters).  Callie has been recently hired as a 
waitress, something that makes Dolores, the restaurant's other waitress, 
extremely upset -- Dolores believes Callie's hiring is intended as punishment
for sleeping with Dollie's husband years ago.  The tensions between Dollie, 
Dolores and Callie escalate as Victor is caught inbetween the three women: 
devoted to his mother, yet silently desiring Callie, and actively rejecting 
the advances of the flirtatious and slutty Dolores.  When Victor's mother 
dies, Victor can't bear to make the changes necessary to continue his life, 
flirting with his many options and rarely choosing to do anything.
While HEAVY is a film short on dialogue and plot it is unspeakably rich in 
the development and portrayal of the characters within it.  James Mangold 
infuses HEAVY with subtle visual cues to express the characters' emotions, 
and paces the film deliberately lugubriously.  Taylor Vince gives his 
character a wonderful, bittersweet air of repression, love and uncertainty -- 
nearly always having a facial expression that seems to not know whether it 
is a smile or a frown, and eyes that dart back and forth indicating uncomfort.
Liv Tyler and Shelley Winters both give authentic performances, and Debbie 
Harry does a spectacular job in a film much more demanding than the kind of 
drek she's typically present in.
HEAVY often feels so doused in emotional anguish that it feels like a fever
dream, the kind that can awaken you in a cold sweat and a panic.  Victor, 
when at the hospital visiting his mother, goes down to the lunchroom and 
tries to get a hot dog.  He is ignored by an apathetic server and goaded by 
a patient at the hospital who alternately seems crazy and the only one who 
can truly understand Victor -- it plays like a scene out of ERASERHEAD.  When 
the nightmarish aspects break, the viewer is left with emotionally agonizing
scenes such as one where Callie appears at Victor's house unexpectedly and 
notices a picture of her face that Victor had stolen hanging on his 
refrigerator.  Nothing captures the feel of HEAVY better than when the viewer 
watches Callie scan the kitchen with her eyes, not knowing the picture is 
there, and anticipating how she'll negatively react when she finally sees her 
picture hanging on the refrigerator, and what the impact of her seeing the 
picture (and the realization of Victor's longings) will be on Victor.  
Victor's repression is expressed brilliantly in one of the final scenes where 
he finally reveals the anger that has welled up in him throughout the 
movie -- only after an extremely long shot of him looking bewildered, as if 
he had suddenly come to the realization that he is allowed to express his 
anger and not hide it in his wince of a grin.  
Certainly, HEAVY isn't a film for everybody -- understandably, not everbody
enjoys going to a theater to see a film which portrays the sadness and 
longing of its characters and how they react to tragedies in life both big 
and small.  In a movie season of detached and dull films, however, the way 
that first-time director James Mangold sends these character's emotions 
beyond the screen and into the audience is nothing short of magic -- a magic 
unmatched by any other film I've seen this year.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Paradise Lost: The Child Murders at Robin Hood Hills (1996)

Path: news.mks.com!worf.mks.com!viktor
From: news@daily-bugle.newsops.execpc.com
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Subject: REVIEW: Paradise Lost: The Child Murders at Robin Hood Hills (1996)
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Date: 17 Oct 1996 14:52:39 GMT
Organization: Eschatfische Communications (fische.com)
Lines: 102
Sender: viktor@mks.com
Approved: viktor@mks.com
Message-ID: 
Reply-To: esch@fische.com (Dave Cowen)
NNTP-Posting-Host: centi.mks.com
Summary: r.a.m.r. #06107
Keywords: author=Cowen
Originator: viktor@worf.mks.com
There's a giddy moment in the second half of PARADISE LOST: THE 
CHILD MURDERS AT ROBIN HOOD HILLS when, entirely through events that 
would not have happened had the documentary filmmakers not been there,
a whole new spin on the circumstances surrounding the murders that 
PARADISE LOST is documenting develops. Perhaps MAN BITES DOG was 
prophetic after all: some of the best documentaries we've seen over 
the last few years (ROGER & ME, HEIDI FLEISS: HOLLYWOOD MADAM) have 
featured the documentary filmmaker as protagonist, not just blindly 
documenting a person or event, but actively playing the part of what 
Errol Morris called the "detective-director," doing research and 
pushing themselves directly into the lives of the individuals being 
chronicled by the documentary. 
In PARADISE LOST: THE CHILD MURDERS AT ROBIN HOOD HILLS, originally 
filmed on video for an HBO series, directors Joe Berlinger and Bruce 
Sinofsky follow the case of a triple homicide where three young 
children were attacked in West Memphis. When being pursued by the 
police (for relatively unstated reasons) a young man, Jesse, fingers 
Damien (a young man in the "goth" lifestyle who reads about Wicca and 
listens to Slayer) as well as Jason, a boy who frequently "hung out" 
with Damien, as being participants in the murders. Jesse's defense 
claims that the testimony was "forced on him" by the police, and that 
Jesse's low IQ prevented him from being able to provide rational 
answers to the types of interrogation methods used by the police, 
causing him to repeat the scenario the police presented to him, not 
the actual events that happened. Ultimately, in spite of a possible 
deal that would lessen the impact of a possible guilty verdict,
Jesse refuses to testify against Damien or Jason. Damien's defense 
indicates that there is no physical evidence linking Damien to the 
crime, and that he is being persecuted for his "style" -- the clothes 
he wears, the music he listens to, the books he reads. Jason's defense
argues that guilt by association is no reason to put away a 16-year 
old when there's no physical proof of any association with the crime. 
While the bulk of the movie spends time in the court, the filmmakers 
also focus on the parents of the murdered boys. At first, it would
seem that it would be impossible not to feel sympathy for parents 
whose children had been murdered in such a brutal manner... but as 
the movie progresses, the attitudes and actions of the parents, one 
in particular, begin to grow more and more disturbing -- in such a 
way to suggest that, given the opportunity, they would be capable of 
just as brutal an action as the murders of their children in 
retribution to those who have been accused with little evidence as 
backup. A shot of the parents naming pumpkins after the accused and 
then blowing them up with semi-automatic weapons is particularly 
disturbing. 
As they did in their 1992 documentary BROTHER'S KEEPER, Berlinger 
and Sinofsky focus on much more than just the trial, bringing in 
subtexts focusing on nature of stupidity (and the perception of it), 
the nature of religion in a small town, the importance of image, the 
legal issue of reasonable doubt, and much more. The film is not 100% 
objective: while the filmmakers portray almost everyone in the film 
as being equally vain or stupid (the exception being the 16 year- 
old Jason, who seems to be the most intelligent and calm individual 
participating in the proceedings), the filmmakers use haunting camera 
shots that play on many levels that subtly point the viewer to the 
filmmakers' agendas and ideas. This can hardly be considered a flaw,
however: a two and a half hour presentation of trials and events 
that spanned months of time can not be objective, and the way 
Berlinger and Sinofsky put the case together for the viewer, offering 
their opinion in a manner that is not blatant or manipulative, keeps 
the filmmakers from being so biased as to present an inaccurate view 
of the proceedings. To describe the kind of brilliant shots which 
visually provide the clues and subtext referred to above would
be to give away many of the important and shocking events in the 
film -- something that would damage the enjoyment of the film greatly 
for the viewer. There are a host of surprises, many unintentionally 
very funny, in PARADISE LOST, that could be ruined by a badly-placed 
spoiler. Despite the fact that PARADISE LOST is a documentary that 
runs over two hours, don't be under the impression that it will be 
boring or longwinded: like the similarly impressive documentary HOOP
DREAMS, the film is impossible to predict... creating lots of edge-of-
your-seat suspense along the way. 
PARADISE LOST is ultimately a much more accomplished film than the 
earlier BROTHER'S KEEPER done by the same team. In PARADISE LOST we 
simply look at a situation through the eyes of the filmmaker, letting 
the words, actions, and camera-level view of others tell the story, 
where in BROTHER'S KEEPER, the filmmakers plied the subjects of the 
film with pointed and obtrusive questions. By being active 
participants in the proceedings, yet never straying or manipulating 
the facts in any way, PARADISE LOST becomes an incredibly 
fascinating, enjoyable and successful documentary -- and one that 
lends itself to portray a disturbing but accurate view of human 
nature lurking below the surface of both the film and our communities. 
Dave Cowen (esch@fische.com)
Eschatfische. ------------------------------------ http://www.fische.com

Title
Review for Breaking the Waves (1996)
At the end of each episode of his television show THE KINGDOM, Lars 
Von Trier appeared as a presenter, dressed in his dapper best, offering a
teaser for the next show with the most smirking and derisive expression 
imaginable.  Von Trier's appearances were my favorite part of THE 
KINGDOM -- it was as if he was goading the more naive viewers in the 
audience lest some would take his fantastic modern-day ghost story 
seriously.  Von Trier doesn't show up at the end of BREAKING THE WAVES, 
but I envision him standing there, chortling to himself: with this new 
film, Von Trier has created a completely indefensible, illogical and 
incredibly badly shot video which through the assistance of art-film 
cliches, overacting and an strangely audience-pleasing ending is playing 
in movie theaters to four-star reviews around the world.  If you see 
BREAKING THE WAVES and enjoy it, you're being mocked.  If you've seen 
BREAKING THE WAVES and disliked it, you've wasted your money.  Both ways, 
it's not worth seeing under any circumstance.
[This review contains extremely major spoilers, separated at the end from 
the rest of the text.]
If Lars Von Trier were a beginning director, it would be possible to see 
BREAKING THE WAVES as a bold and audacious beginning revealing a hidden 
talent.  Unfortunately, Von Trier has already proven his talent: 1991's 
EUROPA (ZENTROPA in the United States) is a technically and thematically 
outstanding film, full of breathtaking visual effects, tight editing and 
wonderfully subdued emotional performances -- which unfortunately went 
unnoticed in most film markets.  While his earlier feature-length film 
THE ELEMENT OF CRIME lacked as strong a thematic backbone, some of its 
imagery was similarly striking and revolutionary.  In BREAKING THE WAVES, 
however, a hand-held video camera captures the action on the screen, 
yielding grainy, out-of-focus shots which would not seem out of place in 
the video library of any camcorder owner's.  The editing of the video is 
equally jittery, often making arbitrary jump cuts to scenes which provide 
no action, or the same actor reciting different dialog.  The film opens 
on a title card (which, in standard Von Trier fashion has Von Trier's 
name larger than the name of the film itself) while the camera shakes and 
wobbles -- literally, any home movie enthusiast could shoot a video with 
more grace and stability than this one.  Then as if to poke fun at the
blatantly amateurish production values, Von Trier mattes the video in the
widescreen Cinemascope aspect ratio and divides each section of the story
with an richly colored and beautifully animated title-card. 
Emily Watson's performance as the dim Bess has been universally praised 
for the simple reason that Watson takes very basic emotions and projects 
them for miles, turning a smile into a full-blown wide-eyed gape and a 
frown into a shreiking fit of self-loathing.  Her performance is so 
ridiculously overstated that it's difficult to give her character any 
credulity: one thinks while watching the film not so much about what her 
character is feeling, but how hard Watson is trying to project the raw 
emotions that the character is supposed to be showing.  Katrin Catrlidge 
and Adrian Rawlins, on the other hand, offer extremely fine performances 
as Bess' sister-in-law and doctor -- Rawlins especially does a very good 
job of minimizing some of Watson's overstatement.  The rest of the cast 
are also believable, creating a strong counterpoint to Watson's 
overexaggerated performance of Bess.
The story of BREAKING THE WAVES is one linking spirituality and sexual 
abuse.  The video begins when good-spirited but slightly crazy Bess 
marries Jan, an oil-rig worker on holiday, and enjoys her newly found 
sexuality.  When Jan leaves to work on the rig, Bess prays to her God 
to bring him back (Watson plays both parts, intoning God's words with a
lower-pitched tone) and gets her wish, although not as she intended.  Jan 
is brought back to town after being hit on the head, and is paralyzed: 
doctors expect Jan to live, but to never walk again.  While in the 
hospital, Jan asks Bess, in order to help him feel better, to go out and
perform sexual acts with the local men.  Bess begrudgingly obliges him,
allowing men to abuse her sexually more and more as she believes that her 
actions will cause God to heal Jan in return for her own selfless acts.
Further discussion of the story continues below, underneath the spoiler 
warning.
What is shocking is that in the epilogue of the film, Von Trier affirms 
Bess' faith: Bess dies, Jan appears on crutches, and church bells ring 
from the heavens.  This would,on first thought, to seem offensive to all 
parties watching the film.  I would imagine that those watching the video 
from a religious background would be offended by the idea that the road 
to salvation is forged through acts of abusive sex, and that those 
watching the video from a less faithful background would be put off by 
Von Trier's quite literal portrayal of God.  I'd be wrong, however, and 
here's why:
In fashioning his film, Von Trier has created a pornographic fantasy 
which the average moviegoer would never have the "decency" to rent 
outside the trappings of an art film: when you take this production on 
its literal level, a story shot on video about a woman who is forced to 
perform sexual acts with random men, it sounds (and occasionally looks) 
like the kind of film you'd rent in the back room in your local video 
store and not see at your local art theater.  However, by making the 
individual forcing Bess to have sex God, and by making the reward for 
these actions the survival of her lover and a place in heaven, Von 
Trier makes Bess' demise through absusive sexual acts carry an air of 
false nobility.  But what nobility?  In the real world, regardless of 
one's take on spirituality, anyone with half a brain knows that Bess' 
actions would do nothing but get her killed.  This is sleazy, sleazy 
stuff here.  "Make the main character act out of a selfless notion to 
a higher power," Von Trier seems to be saying, "and the audience will 
watch anything."  The viewer can have it both ways, being titillated 
by the boyish sexual fantasies in the film while feeling righteous by 
agreeing with the spiritual elements and sympathies with Watson's 
easily understood performance at the same time -- even when these parts
of the film's narrative don't logically hold together.  A test of a 
viewer's hypocracy, perhaps?
After Von Trier's EUROPA lost to (the admittedly superior) BARTON FINK 
at the Cannes film festival, Von Trier gave the Cannes jury "the finger." 
Now, after releasing EUROPA, which astounded on visual and spiritual 
levels and that film going nowhere in the cinematic world, Von Trier 
has taken the ultimate revenge on the movie-going public by making a 
deliberately poor film which is designed to be a smash on the art-film
scene: I really could see Von Trier giving the finger and chortling at 
the audience throughout every frame in the film^H^H^H^Hvideo.  It's a 
brilliant guerilla tactic -- but please excuse me for being a bit upset 
after paying 7 dollars for the experience.
Signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / / w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) -------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for American Buffalo (1996)
The last two films by David Mamet, GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS and OLEANNA, have both
had titles that seem to have little to do with the plot at hand, but are 
instead obscure or cunning references.  That's why, upon watching AMERICAN 
BUFFALO, I was very surprised to see that most of the movie's plot and events
are given away by the title.  The word buffalo doesn't just have meaning 
as a noun, but also a more obscure meaning as a verb, to loosely describe 
the process of trying to butt one's way into a situation to keep a person from
acheiving their goals or desires.
The three central characters of AMERICAN BUFFALO, Don (Dennis Franz), Teach 
(Dustin Hoffman) and Bobby (Sean Nelson) play havok with each other's lives
in the fashion outlined above.  Don owns an antique shop that seems to have
quite a bit of stock but little that is saleable.  Teach seems down and out,
griping about a relationship and spending his day at Don's.  Bobby is a young
boy who hangs out at Don's shop to make some cash.  The three form allegiances
between each other which change rapidly: Don could be defending the actions 
of Bobby one minute, and then scorning him the other... with Teach switching
from being critical to being supportive of the young boy in the same amount
of time.  The film takes a slice of one day in the life of these three, as a 
plan to steal an American buffalo nickel develops, sours, and does each of 
the three a lot more harm to each of them than good. 
Of the three actors who make up AMERICAN BUFFALO, only Dennis Franz seems 
comfortable with Mamet's fragmented, repetitive dialogue.  Franz plays Don
with conviction, and the viewer is able to understand his motivations when
aligning himself either with or against the Teach and Bobby characters. 
Dustin Hoffman overplays Teach to a ridiculous degree, often giving Mamet's
dialogue a kind of oratory bravado that destroys the rhythm of the text,
and Sean Nelson seems confused not only as to the motivations of the 
character of Bobby, but also as to the rythym of the dialogue.
Despite the surprisingly poor acting, AMERICAN BUFFALO is still of value.
Mamet's plays are fun-house mirrors of real-life confrontations, distorting 
the way we speak and the way we act into hyper, inarticulate overblown 
battles of misunderstanding: the way men struggle to desperately keep control 
of a situation they're in is exaggerated in a Mamet script but ultimately 
based in reality.  The character of Teach speaks with a sense of dogma, as if 
everthing he says is absolutely correct even when the logic is frayed, 
and Bobby comes off as threatening or confusing even when he's acting with
the best of intentions, traits which serve to mean more in a confrontation 
than facts or evidence.  Mamet's stories are the perfect glimpse into 
seemingly petty arguments which develop into life or death struggles -- 
similar to the worst of the arguments that occur in real life -- and the 
consequences of the way that men and women deliberately mislead each other to 
gain control of power, or wealth, or money.  It's a pity that AMERICAN BUFFALO 
wasn't able to explore these issues without a brand of acting which buffalos 
the message of the film as much as the three characters buffalo each other.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Secrets & Lies (1996)
"Secrets and lies!" spouts Maurice (Timothy Spall) at a family 
gathering with the most terrific sense of combined contempt and 
concern of any outburst I've ever heard in a film.  The title is 
what the film is about: the ways that people hold things from the 
people who are close to them, and how those things can burst 
back to the surface at any moment, disrupting everybody's lives.
If only viewing the first third of SECRETS & LIES, one would be 
tempted to call the film "Smiles and Frowns" -- the film darts between 
shots of Maurice doing his business (photography, eliciting strange
and artificial expressions from his clients) and the rest of his
immediate family who he is not able (except, on a picture hanging
on his mantle from 16 years ago) to elicit smiles from: his wife
Monica (Phyllis Logan) who works on stencilling their house, his
sister Cynthia (Brenda Blethyn), a factory worker who appears to 
be suffering from a nervous breakdown, his niece Roxanne (Claire 
Rushbrook) who is just turning 21 and never speaks with Cynthia, 
and Hortense (Marianne Jean-Baptiste), who is just about to become 
part of the family.  The contrast of the artificial smiles and 
the sulking, brooding nature of everyone in the family is striking
and occasionally very funny.  
As in other films by director Mike Leigh, it's the performances 
that hold SECRETS & LIES together.  Brenda Blethyn's nervy, love-
starved Cynthia strikes just the right note: a scene in which she 
tries to get a hug from her brother Maurice is touching but truly 
pitiable, and her first encounters with Hortense are filled with
a shaking and trepidation that I've never seen portrayed quite 
so realistically in film.  In a role such as Cynthia's, it's hard
to create just the right balance of sympathy and disgust to 
understand the other characters actions toward her, but Blethyn 
hits the target dead-on.  The other actors, especially Jean-Baptiste,
do an admirable job, and a family barbeque scene which under 
lesser actors could be maudlin, in SECRETS & LIES can tear your 
heart out.  
SECRETS & LIES is a realistically bleak picture, but not as much so 
as Leigh's last film, NAKED.  The characters move through a flux 
in which their actions and revelations can either be heartwarming
or heartbreaking, moving from anguish to contentness in the kinds
of surprising but smooth transitions that we see in real life.  
Mike Leigh's celebrated style of storytelling has always struck 
me as being amazing in its own right: the concept of starting with 
a basic idea and then having the characters improvise the parts until
the characters become fully developed and a script can be written 
seems tremendously risky -- but Leigh's work is nearly invariably 
brilliant, and his films end up painting a much more full portrait
of his characters than any other directors' film could.
SECRETS & LIES is one of the rare films that ends on a happy note 
that doesn't seem contrived, as though the characters had purged
themselves of all of the underlying anxieties gnawing at them
and causing the conflicts present throughout the rest of the movie.
SECRETS & LIES is a film of wonderful realism, and is definately one 
of the best released this year.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Institute Benjamenta, or This Dream People Call Human Life (1995)
It seems strange when watching a film which consists almost
entirely of images which can only be called unique to think
obsessively while viewing the movie about how derivative the 
movie really is.  While INSTITUTE BENJAMENTA features some of 
the most striking images seen in any film this year, the plot 
and characterizations which drive the film seem to be taken 
from other recent films -- mixed together, and put together in 
a way that can be best described as puzzling.
This decade has brought us a surprising number of moody, ethereal
films about attending a school on servitude in an European country:
Lars Von Trier's 1991 EUROPA (ZENTROPA in the US) featured an
American who traveled to Germany immediately after World War II
to offer the Germans some "sympathy" by serving on a passenger car
on the Zentropa line.  Guy Maddin's 1992 CAREFUL was an incredible 
acid-trip sendup of the German "Mountain Film", featuring a main 
character who goes to school to become a servant.  Both EUROPA and
CAREFUL featured incredibly innovative images -- EUROPA, shot in
cinemascope and fluctuating between black and white and color.
often featuring both on the same screen, and CAREFUL with its 
garish tinted colors and deteriorated look.  Both films are very
different from one another, and both, in my opinion, are of great
value.
INSTITUTE BENJAMENTA also takes place in a school, one where Jakob
(Mark Rylance) is training as a butler under the watch of Lisa
(Alice Krige) and Herr Benjamenta (Gottfried John).  The film 
spans the time in which Jakob joins the school, and ends at the
school's demise.  The Brothers Quay use the school less as a 
statement on servitude or any other topic but as a funhouse in 
which to play their visual tricks: the camera often shoots across 
the room to reveal the writing on an obscure contraption, or 
purposefully blur as to make an image look like something else.  
Little is established other than the basics: after Jakob enters 
the school, he becomes a troublemaker -- but becomes respected 
both by Lisa and Herr Benjamenta, both of whom view him as a 
confidant.  While Jakob, and many of the other characters spend 
much of the film engaging in talk that could at best be called 
philosophizing, little of it holds together, and the film seems 
to lack any sort of coherant meaning.
Instead, the viewer focuses on the images: often startling, and 
often beautiful in a gothic sense.  The Brothers Quay obsess on
dust and thread -- INSTITUTE BENJAMENTA is one of the few films
in which there is such a thing as a "gratuitous thread shot".  
Light and shadows flash across walls, as if the sun is moving 
through the film at a much faster rate than in real life.  The
film is sprinkled with odd visual jokes and puns which are often
as obscure or obtuse as they are funny.  
Unfortunately, there isn't much else in this film to admire.  The
use of a butler school seems completely perfunctory, and there 
isn't anything on that topic to be found here that wasn't already
covered in more depth in EUROPA or CAREFUL, nor do the images seem 
as shocking or beautiful when compared with the elegance of the 
aforementioned two films.  While the Brothers Quay are extremely 
capable when creating stop-motion animation, they seem lost as 
to what to do with the human element, and much of the film seems 
to be filler to take the film from image to image.  Ultimately, 
INSTITUTE BENJAMENTA is something of a beautiful, confusing bore.
If you're interested in seeing INSTITUTE BENJAMENTA, I'd instead 
recommend seeing EUROPA or CAREFUL (the latter of which is playing 
at the Music Box theater in Chicago in less than a month).
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
In order to write this review, I need to admit that at one time I 
considered myself to be something of a Howard Stern fan.  It was about
the time back in college when I had shown a number of friends Stern's
Pay-Per-View special, in which a man sets his private parts aflame.  
The man explained that he was trying to combat a case of the crabs and
had succeeded in burning them to death by dousing that area of his 
body with lighter fluid.  This sparked a discussion among my friends 
about the safety of using lighter fluid to burn off bodily hair, which 
ultimately ended in one of them running down the hallway of the dorm 
to the bathroom with a flaming hand.  He spent the rest of the day with
his hand in a bucket of water.  So much for the safety of using lighter 
fluid to burn off bodily hair. 
But watching Howard Stern's PRIVATE PARTS provoked something in me 
that I've only felt one other time when watching a movie, and it wasn't
the kind of combination of titillation and amazement that Stern's radio
and TV work seems to inspire.  During the climactic scene, after Howard 
is cut off of the air after interviewing the first naked woman on radio 
and has stormed into his producer's office provoking a fight, I felt
nauseous.  My legs gave out, my stomach seized, and for once, I wanted
nothing more than to get out of the theater.  The other time this had 
happened was during the second half of Scorcese's GOODFELLAS, in which I 
was overwhelmed by the paranoia Ray Liotta's character was experiencing. 
At the viewing of PRIVATE PARTS I attended, though, it wasn't paranoia 
that made we want to leave the theater.  It was disgust.
Throughout the past couple of years, I've found myself strangely charmed
by two movies which portrayed men who found success in life by doing
things that offended other people: Terry Zwigoff's CRUMB, and Milos 
Forman's PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT.  CRUMB, seemed to overcome the 
insanity present in his family and provide brilliant social commentary 
by venting those impulses through brilliantly illustrated comics.  Flynt, 
in a somewhat inadvertant way, upheld the rights for Americans to parody 
public figures and display the human body without restriction.  I expected 
PRIVATE PARTS to trigger the same feeling in me: the triumph of an 
underdog who pays his dues, but ultimately gets what he wants in life by 
acting on his impulses, the "moral majority" be damned.  But after Stern's 
on-air massage from a naked woman, during the fight, I didn't find Stern 
heroic... but pitiful.  What was he fighting for?
Critics have expressed surprise that PRIVATE PARTS would portray 
Stern as being a good-hearted family man, and that at many times, 
PRIVATE PARTS seems to want to do nothing but espouse family values.
How could it be any different?  If you were making a movie about your
life, with you playing yourself in the starring role, would you really
make yourself look like, well, you really are?  Of course not.  With the
vast majority of life stories, the film would be a huge flop.  It's all
ridiculously cynical -- in order to make the film make money, you've got 
to play to the type of person that the masses want to see, so you make 
yourself seem like you're just "playing a role," that you're really a 
sweet person underneath it all to win over both friends and enemies.  
Throughout the film, Stern gripes that he's always misunderstood.  No
wonder!  With such brazen manipulation of public perception, glossing
over the contradictions in his personality, Stern seems nothing more 
than a money grubbing jerk.  "Put the kids in the last scene!  People
will eat it up!"  It's that cynical calculation of alternating 
sleaze with a family values image that made me literally sick to my
stomach.  
The film isn't without good points.  Stern's acting is natural, and
his co-hosts Robin Quivers and Fred Norris do an admirable job in front
of the camera.  The film moves at a fast pace, and Stern, when he's 
shown doing the show itself, never fails to be hilarious.  It's when 
the movie goes "behind the scenes" that it become artificial, treacly
and rings horribly false.  
The Neue Slowenische Kunst have a similar problem.  NSK, an art 
collective based out of Ljubljana, Slovenia, bathe traditional art
such as music, painting and dance with the overtones of fascism.  
Adopting the images and sounds of the totalitarian rule of their hometown 
Ljublijana, industrial musicians Laibach create pounding modern 
symphonies, often converting American or European pop standards into
a frightening, pounding industrial brew.  Their album Let it Be, in
which the entire Beatles album Let It Be is transmogrified into a 
throbbing, stomping teutonic sound, is a classic of industrial music.
It's also very funny, and very obviously an ironic joke.  It's a pity
that PREDICTIONS OF FIRE isn't as well.
In a completely deadpan style, director Michael Benson analyzes the
development of the Neue Slowenische Kunst and the origins of their 
art, linking it with Ljublijana's history of occupation.  Benson spends
most of the movie's time showing old newsreel footage and reciting,
in a dry and monotonous tone, the history of Slovenia.  
How does hostory ultimately affect Neue Slowenische Kunst's art?  Very 
little, it would seem.  In what brief moments of what we see of Laibach, 
Irwin, or any of the other artists in the collective, it would seem that
they're doing nothing more than pulling off postmodern pranks in the art 
world (similar to Britain's K Foundation, whose film debut was the much 
more impressive and direct WATCH THE K FOUNDATION BURN A MILLION QUID),
adopting the image of fascism to do nothing more than shock.  The
mixture of dry documentary footage and art terrorism never meld, and 
much of the output of the NSK is glossed over to make way for history 
lessons which sound recited from a textbook.  Like PRIVATE PARTS, 
PREDICTIONS OF FIRE seems to be revisionist history, trying to force
NSK's output into a historical context to make it look serious or 
important, and ultimately, PREDICTIONS OF FIRE rings just as false. 
Signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david
(esch@fische.com) --------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
This review contains what might be considered spoilers, but I honestly don't 
think that it would spoil the film for anyone.  There's two sides to every 
story.
Like a jazz artist, Lynch takes his head and adds new riffs, playing his pet 
themes with a different tone, or improvising with new ideas.  While with 
certain filmmakers this would indicate a lack of inspiration, with Lynch it 
indicates a desire to explore deeper with certain themes which resonate 
throughout his work.  In order to understand those themes, and the resonance 
that they provide in the context of these films, it's necessary to look back 
at his prior works to shape the meaning of the seemingly inexplicable plots 
Lynch weaves together.  Unfortunately, this hardly means that LOST HIGHWAY is 
Lynch's best or more successful film.  While there are distinct moments of 
brilliance in LOST HIGHWAY, and the very structure of the film allows Lynch 
to explore his primary themes in new ways, there are flaws which make LOST 
HIGHWAY seem mediocre when compared with other films in Lynch's stable.
In TWIN PEAKS, the Little Man From Another Place (Michael Anderson) shouts 
out the word "Doppelganger!" played forward on tape after it had been 
recorded from the actor reciting the word backwards.  The idea of a 
doppelganger, a ghostly double of a living person, is a theme explored in the
prematurely aborted TWIN PEAKS that has carried over into LOST HIGHWAY's 
universe -- and is an idea essential to the understanding of the film.  Lynch 
himself, it would appear, would seem to have a doppelganger: the genuinely 
nightmarish imagery of his films don't seem to have any link with Lynch's own
innocent, genial Eagle-scout republican image.  This separation of the 
nightmarish and the innocent in Lynch's films have led critics to berate 
these films for having a poor sense of morality, or portraying good and evil 
in a literal and simplistic sense.  But that doesn't seem to be the case: most 
of Lynch's characters seem to exhibit both sides of this moral structure, 
having both innocent ideals yet being intimately familiar (or curious) about 
the darker sides of human life -- something that one rarely sees in the 
standard good guy / bad guy structure of the average Hollywood film.  It is 
natural, not just natural but common, in life for a person to be at once 
repulsed by and drawn in by something, or for a person to have a side that 
they consider light, or moral and right, and dark, a more primal, amoral side. 
 Lynch takes this element of human life, often hidden or simplified in both 
life and in art, and makes them accessible through his surreal visions.  On 
the most simple level the doppelganger, in a Lynch film, is a literal 
separation of a character's "light" and "dark" sides.
Nearly everyone in LOST HIGHWAY has a doppelganger.   Fred Madison, played by
a brooding Bill Pullman, is a tenor, a saxophonist who plays free jazz at 
local nightclubs and on the local radio.  His doppelganger is Pete Dayton 
(Balthazar Getty, doing his best Luke Perry), a talented young mechanic who 
seems to spend more time having sex than fixing cars.  Fred lives with Renee 
(Patricia Arquette), a brunette who seems to be straight out of THE BETTY 
PAGES.  Pete meets who appears to be Renee's doppelganger Alice (also 
Arquette), who is a blond sexpot in the same vein.  Both Renee and Alice 
know Andy (Michael Massee) and Mr. Eddy, who is also known as Dick Laurent 
(Robert Loggia), all of whom are involved in the pornography industry.
"Her name is Renee!  If she told you her name was Alice, she's lying," says 
the Mystery Man, played by Robert Blake.  With white facepaint and no 
eyebrows, the Mystery Man appears to be no less than Mephistopheles himself 
(or Bono's Macphisto, perhaps?).  Fred dreams of the Mystery Man's face on 
Renee's body one night... and Renee/Alice and the Mystery Man are often seen 
at the same place, but never in the same shot.  It would seem that Renee's 
doppelganger isn't her blond self, Alice -- when Pete sees a picture of 
Laurent, Renee, Alice and Andy, he asks her which one she is.  "I'm this one," 
she says, scratching her finger over Alice's blond body.  When the police come
 to the scene of a crime later, they look at the picture.  Alice's image isn't 
part of it.  
A true dread creeps through the opening scenes.  Dialogue that is alternately 
cliched and filled with meaning between the lines flows when Fred and Renee 
speak with each other, always in a slow, stunted manner throughout the first 
30 minutes of the film.  Renee says that she's not going to watch Fred at the 
club tonight because she's "going to read".  "Read?" Fred says incredulously.  
He continues until she smirks and lets out an uncomfortable laugh.  "I'm glad 
to see I can still make you laugh," says Bill in a deadpan tone, "that's why 
I married you."  Bill's face seems to appear and disappear into darkness of 
his apartment through this portion of the film, offering some of the most 
impressive visual compositions seen in film for a very long time.  These 
shots are as low-contrast as one could possibly push the film stock, making 
images sink in and out of darkness, forcing the viewer to search the film's 
widescreen image in fear that there's something lurking just out of sight.  
These are by far the best scenes of the movie, ones that hearken back to 
Lynch's ERASERHEAD in style, and ones that truly unnerve.  It seems incredible
that Peter Deming, cinematographer of such straightforward, undemanding work 
as SON IN LAW or COSMIC SLOP, would be able to create such outstanding images, 
and leaves the filmgoer to wonder if Lynch didn't do most of the work on this 
portion of the film on his own.
One of the quintessential Lynch images is that of an electric light which, 
when it finds itself suddenly glowing too bright, burns out with a violent 
crack.  Similarly, Lynch will occasionally bathe his human or supernatural 
characters in a bright, almost blue light, to underline moments of the feeling 
of love, or warmth, or the desire thereof.  Henry Spencer, the main character 
of ERASERHEAD, finds himself fascinated by a "lady in the radiator", who seems 
to irradiate warmth and promise him that, in heaven, everything is fine -- 
and when at the end of the ERASERHEAD, he chastely embraces her, the screen 
is filled in that similarly white light.  However, when earlier in the film 
Henry makes love to a woman, he draws her into a pool illuminated similarly 
in white -- the glow disappears soon after which she realizes and is horrified 
with the situation Henry is in.  In LOST HIGHWAY's pivotal scene, Fred's 
doppelganger Pete is making love with Alice, bathed in the white light of the
headlights of their car.  "I want you," says Pete.  "You'll never have me," 
says Alice, and walks off, nude, into a shack.  The light from the headlights
fade, and we see Fred get up, walk into the shack, only to find the Mystery 
Man.  
Many have accused Lynch's view of sex as being adolescent.  In Lynch's films, 
however, when the characters crave love they turn to sex believing it to 
provide one in the same, and are disappointed and embittered when that is not 
the case.  In the story of LOST HIGHWAY, we see the young and virile Pete 
transform into Fred, the bitter and haunted artist, after having failed to 
find true love.  Is it too much to have Renee, a woman who draws them in with 
promises of what they desire and then leaves them empty and cold, to seem to 
have the devil as her doppelganger?  Maybe.  Maybe not.
What Lynch is doing, and what he has done in all of his best works, is to 
take a look at the dark side of life.  ERASERHEAD, exploring childbirth as a 
biological nightmare, took the most familiar event known to man and showed the 
dark side of it so completely and surrealistically, that most viewers were 
either confused or repulsed (or both) by a relatively simple and universal 
story of a young father.  In BLUE VELVET, Lynch examined the dark side that 
could exist in any community.  TWIN PEAKS literalized the concept of the 
doppelganger, as in the last episode, when the main character's soul is taken, 
literally splitting the character into good and evil apparitions.  Does this 
draw an easy line between good and evil?  Not so -- characters  who appear 
evil, such as TWIN PEAK's Windom Earle or LOST HIGHWAY's Dick Laurent are 
destroyed by Lynch's apparitions of the real forces of darkness ("Bob" in 
TWIN PEAKS, or LOST HIGHWAY's Mystery Man) as if to show that individuals who
try to emulate evil in the real world are nothing more than dangerous poseurs. 
In Lynch's films, the real evil stems from natural emotional and biological 
processes, so separated from the happy-faced whitewash that we as a society
tend to put on these events or feelings, that they are exaggerated to a 
surreal degree when discovered -- and that is precisely what makes Lynch's 
best moments genuinely frightening.  
In fashioning a story that relies on showing two sides of every character, 
Lynch and Gifford have plotted the film so that no character appears on 
screen with their doppelganger counterpart.  The story instead takes place as 
a cycle, where every action has a reaction in the film, but not necessarily 
after the event occurs in a linear fashion: an action can take place in the 
latter half of the film whose reaction appears in the first half.  Things that
seem needlessly surreal may in fact be a harbinger of developments to come -- 
in a movie like LOST HIGHWAY, where literal events go hand in hand with 
surrealistic representations, it's easy to confuse the two.  When the Mystery 
Man appears at the party and plays a trick with Fred's cell phone, is it 
really that the Mystery Man is both at the party and at Fred's house at the 
same time, or is the Mystery Man revealing that he is the doppelganger of 
Renee, who has been invited both to the party (by Andy, or Dick Laurent) but 
also to Fred's house?  When Fred goes back to his house, after the party, he 
leaves Renee outside, checking to see if there's a Mystery Man inside... "Of 
course there isn't," he ends up muttering.  He's right. 
The acting in Lost Highway is what ultimately spoils the fun.  None of the 
actors show much range, with Loggia's half-baked Frank Booth impression to 
Getty's and Pullman's brooding -- and all of the minor players give 
ridiculously artificial and deadpan performances.  Only Robert Blake as the 
Mystery Man strikes the perfect tone, and one wonders what this film would 
have been like had Lynch used actors of the caliber of his other work.  
Also problematic is the soundtrack.  Fluctuating between Lynch's grand 'sound 
design', where background noises add depth to the film along with overtones 
from the talented Angelo Badalamenti and the appropriate and energetic work of
Barry Adamson (whose faux-soundtrack albums have in the past shown his ability 
to create filmic moods through music alone) are mixed in with inappropriate 
songs from NIN and a ridiculously distracting cover of "This Magic Moment" by 
Lou Reed.  
LOST HIGHWAY is worth seeing for any of Lynch's fans, but will seem obtuse 
and overwrought to anyone not familiar with Lynch's work.  The film lags in 
its second half, and has its share of flaws from the standpoint of editing, 
music and acting.  What isn't problematic, however, is Lynch's vision, which 
is more clear and daring than it had been with his last feature films, WILD AT 
HEART and FIRE WALK WITH ME, films where Lynch's world view took a back seat 
to cheap thrills.  There's cheap thrills here, but there's a lot more for
the adventuresome filmgoer to discover, too.  
Signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david
(esch@fische.com) ----------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Currently making the rounds in major market cities, the new 70mm
restoration of Alfred Hitchcock's VERTIGO is playing to packed 
houses.  While the film has been given the title "masterpiece"
by many, and the restoration is one of the most expensive ever
done, both VERTIGO and its restoration prove to be mixed blessings --
mostly impressive, but occasionally dissapointing.  
VERTIGO tells the tale of John Ferguson (JAMES STEWART), known as
Scottie to his aquaintances, an ex-cop who during a chase over the
rooftops witnessed a fellow officer plummet to his doom.  This has
had a tremendous impact on Scottie, now suffering vertigo when going
as far as a couple of steps on his friend Midge's (Barbara Bel 
Geddes) stepstool, thereby taking him "out of action."  Soon, after
a call from old college chum Gavin Elster (Tom Helmore), Scottie
is back on the prowl watching over Elster's wife Madeleine (Kim 
Novak) who appears to be possessed by unnatural spirits.  As Scottie
becomes more and more drawn into the case, by the stunning third act, 
the film abandons the guise of being a "thriller" and becomes a 
psychological drama focusing on the obsessive relationship between 
Kim Novak's character and Scottie.  
This last third of VERTIGO is what makes it a classic: the motivations
behind the Rube Goldberg contraption of the plot that dominates the
first and second acts are revealed, the story is explained, and the
film is left to examine the feelings present between Novak and Stewart.  
The portrait VERTIGO paints of love is a frightening one, one based
more on obsession and image than one of understanding or companionship.
As Scotty's desire for the image of Madeleine grows, he placates
these feelings by dominating Judy Barton (also played by Kim Novak), 
shaping and modelling her back into the image of Madeleine that he 
desires, seemingly without care for her real feelings or respect for 
her personality.  Amazingly, Stewart allows us to remains sympathetic 
with Scottie throughout the film, and it's easy to understand how the 
character's actions are motivated.  Kim Novak plays a wonderful dual 
performance with a tremendous amount of range, believable both as the 
frigid Madeleine and the earthy Judy.  
Unfortunately, the first two thirds of the film take the viewer
through a setup which teeters on the absurd -- and that seems  
unnecessary complex and convoluted, as if Hitchcock were bound 
by the requirement to make a mystery full of red herrings.  The 
first half of the film also has a pacing that many have described 
as "dreamlike", but could also be considered unnecessarily 
slow-paced.  These detractions, however, are worth sitting through
to reach the supurb final act.
While I consider the restoration of VERTIGO to be a noble and 
worthy project, I feel that the restorers made some grave errors.
While the film seems brighter and more colorful in the outdoors
scenes, it often seems artificially dark and grainy indoors.  The
grain itself is often a problem even in the light scenes: despite
the restoration, the print is far from pristine.  In the first
few seconds of many scenes, colors will shift dramatically from
dark to light, or there is excessive noise on the print.  While
I realize that the lengths to which a film can be restored 
depends on the material that the restoration crew is working with,
and that there certainly is an improvement, the picture quality 
of VERTIGO seems underwhelming when compared with, for example,
the recent release of the restored TAXI DRIVER.
Bernard Herrmann's jarring score to VERTIGO sounds spectacular 
in stereo, but the foley work is distracting: certain sounds 
seem much brighter and clearly defined than others, and many new 
sound effects seem unnecessary.  Scuffling footsteps, jingling 
handbags and ocean waves seem overly "bright" sounding and are 
too loud in the mix, to an extent that I caught myself laughing 
unintentionally at some of the new sound effects.  Hopefully, 
if released on video, Universal will have an engineer EQ the 
sound effects tracks again to let them sound more in place with 
the dialogue and location. 
Despite these qualms, the new 70mm Vertigo is definately worth
seeing -- catch it while you can.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Barton Fink (1991)
Every year, somebody posts the "Barton Fink makes absolutely no sense and
never will" post.  Believe it or not, while the Coen boys had a wonderful
time throwing curve balls at the audience, most of the more absurd elements
of Barton Fink _do_ fit together.  Quite nicely, mostly something 
approximating a very clever symbolic joke.  So, I feel compelled to post my 
standard spoiler warning: 
DON'T READ FARTHER IF YOU HAVEN'T SEEN THE FILM BARTON FINK!
and trudge on with interpreting some of the more obscure elements of Barton 
Fink, including the wallpaper, the picture, orphans and dames.
One of the most obvious thematic elements in Barton Fink is the conflict 
between "high art" and "low art".  Barton's a Jewish pseudointellectual,
a New York playwright who likes to think that his uninspired, highfalutin
work is actually "about and for the common man".  Because he avoids themes
about royalty or other themes commonly found in the more pretentious work
of otherwise dull artists, one senses a sort of smugness in Barton, as 
if he feels he's doing some sort of great service to the common man by
writing about him.  In the plot of the film, however, he is forced to 
come to terms with the fact that he is a poseur: when faced with making 
the kind of "low art" that will truly appeal to the "common man" of 
Barton's story, a wrestling picture, Barton is stymied, and suffers 
writer's block.  This conflict is what drives many of the surreal happenings
that occur in the Hotel Earle.
I GUESS THE HEAT'S SWEATING OFF THE WALLPAPER.
Throughout Barton's stay at the Earle, the wallpaper oozes down the wall,
dripping "goopus" as it goes.  This is, for all intensive purposes, a 
symbolic joke.
The Coens, throughout the film, involve Barton and Charlie in what is typically 
some of the most common and pretentious symbolism found in "high" art: the
fire/water dichotomy.  The first time we catch wind of this (pun 
intended), Barton is entering the Hotel Earle.  We see a shot of waves
crashing against a large rock...and the water dissolving into the floor
of the Hotel Earle, as though the brown carpeting were sand.  Throughout
the film, Barton turns for solace to the picture of the girl sitting by the 
water, as the sounds of crashing waves come up in the soundtrack.  Barton is 
tormented, in his room, by a mosquito... depite the fact that Ben Geisler 
assures Barton that "there are no mosquitos in Los Angeles.  Mosquitos breed 
in swamps.  This is a desert!"  Finally, Barton ends up at the shoreline at
the end of film.  No question about it, the symbol of water seems to be
following Barton around.
I don't have to convince you about the link between Charlie Meadows and fire.
As Charlie's temper heightens, so does the temperature.  At the high point 
of his anger, flames literally erupt behind him, setting the hallway of the
Earle ablaze.  The man sweats -- it's HOT...water is purged from his body in
the form of sweat.
What many don't catch is the reference to the pipes behind the walls of
Barton's room.  This is one of the most important threads in the film -- 
early on, when Charlie is talking about hearing the couple engaging in
intercourse in the room next doorthat Barton hears earlier, Barton leaves 
the  room.  Charlie cringes in sadness, and says "Seem like I hear everything 
in this dump.  Must be the pipes or something."  When Barton comes back 
in, Charlie quickly hides his anger, his anger stemming from having to be 
subjected to the sounds of lovemaking being carried in the pipes.
Later, Charlie hears lovemaking again.  Barton starts yelling about
W.P. Mayhew when Audrey comes over to "help with his script" -- which would
have had to wake up Charlie.in the next room.  When Audrey and Barton roll 
onto the bed (with a hilarious reference to the Hayes code rule that in a 
lovemaking scene, a man had to have at least one of his feet on the floor), 
the camera pans over and enters the bathroom.  The sounds of Barton and Audrey 
are echoed as the camera heads into the pipe...the sounds being carried over 
into the Charlie's room.
When cold _water_ is carried through pipes in _hot_ weather, condensation 
forms on pipes -- we all know that.  If the pipe is directly behind 
wallpaper, the sweaty condensation gets through the wall into the 
wallpaper's glue, loosens the glue, and the wallpaper peels.
What a dump.  The Coens manage to take some very highfalutin, pretentious 
symbolism, and turn it into a basic, common, everyday problem in the film.
It doesn't take much symbolic interpretation to realize that the Hotel 
Earle is hell.  Chet, the servant, comes up from the underworld to greet
Barton.  The first three letters out of the elevator operator's mouth 
happen to be sixes.  "A day or a lifetime," reads the stationary.  Take 
note that the pencil which Barton moves from the stationary has no lead.  Not 
a good omen for a writer.
Charlie Meadows is the hotel's resident fallen angel.  And I don't just 
use "fallen angel" in a sense of referring to the big horny red guy himself, 
Charlie is truly is a fallen angel in all senses.  Charlie genuinely wants
to help people, wants to keep people out of the hell that he's in, to keep 
them from the ways he feels.  Note that Charlie trys to sell FIRE and 
casualty insurance.  And hell yeah, he believes in it.  Unfortunately, some
people just don't listen... and in the end, the people who don't buy
insurance tend to get burned.
Many of the early scenes of the film are spent with Charlie trying to
help Barton.  Despite being annoyed at Barton's noise complaint, Barton's
fake sympathy ("I thought you might be...in distress.") gives Charlie the
impression that Barton might be an OK guy, that Barton could help fill some 
of the loneliness in his life, provides him with some empathy.  So, Charlie 
pines to be Barton's muse.  "I could tell ya some stories!" he bellows, 
attempting desperately to be Barton's inspiration for his impending 
wrestling picture.
But the kind of empathy that Charlie desires never arrives.  When Lipnick,
the head of Capitol Pictures, asks Barton which it'll be, "Orphan, or Dame",
Barton responds "Both, maybe"... but we all know that that's not the way
the story will pan out.
Barton tends to ignore Charlie, instead ranting about modern theatre, 
interrupting Charlie at any point when Charlie trys to interject something
important.  It seems that nobody listens to Charlie.  "Opportunities galore," 
he says, talking about his sexual exploits -- but you know this isn't true.  
The same housewives he talks about there are found murdered by the end of the 
film.  Any sort of emotional contact is blocked by his weight ("that's my 
cross to bear"), despite the fact that he has an interesting, lively 
personality.  When he hears the "lovebirds" down the hall, this brings out a
crushing pain in him about what he'll never have.
In the end, Barton chooses the Dame.  Instead of calling to Charlie when
he needs help writing the script, he calls Audrey -- and Audrey comes by
to gie "Bah-ton" that special sort of "undahstahndin'" which Charlie has
never experienced.
When Barton asks him why he killed Audrey, Charlie erupts "Because YOU DON'T 
LISTEN!" and the pus oozes out of his ear.  This, for all intents and
purposes, appears to be a sexual release for Charlie's pent-up aggressions.
Very likely, the wallpaper glue also probably represents sexual fluids.  
Finally, at the end of the film, after Barton and Charlie's confrontation,
Charlie mentions the Finks and Uncle Maury, whose address Barton had given
Charlie earlier in the film.  Barton's frantic telephone call at the end
of the film indicates that the worst has happened: the orphan, to pay back
Barton for choosing the dame, has orphaned Barton.
If any figures in recent history have been seen as literal devils, creating a 
hell on earth, it is without doubt the Nazi regime.  Charlie, before pulling 
the trigger, hails the fuhrer.  His real name is "Mundt," an obviously German 
name.  Even more evidence of the link between Nazi symbolism and the film 
comes with Charlie's presentation of the box that Barton carries with him for 
the end of the film.  The wrapping paper looks remarkably like dried human 
flesh.  This angel has fallen hard.  Perhaps Barton's "common man" wasn't
so common after all... or was he?
"While co-writing the script for their 1990 gangster hit, the brutally 
beautiful _Miller's Crossing_, the found themselves overpowered by
writer's block.  To jolt themselves back into action, they wrote the
first draft of what would later become BARTON FINK..."
The above is from the laserdisc jacket of Barton Fink.  It's fairly 
common knowledge that the Coen's wrote Fink during a bout of writer's
block... so it's fair game to point out the autobiographical elements.
The Coens just happen to be a couple of Jewish scriptwriters whose films
play to the art house crowds but feature more "common" characters.  
Miller's Crossing was a genre film, which ends up being more about 
Tom and Leo's fight for Verna than about gangsterism, a fruity movie
that ended up playing to the critics and not to the common man.
When Barton is writing "The Burlyman", one of the instructions he 
writes into the script is "A young hussy opens the door"... an
instruction from the opening scenes of Miller's Crossing.  I don't
think that there's any question that the film Barton Fink is art 
imitating life.
Where the film shines in irony is in its final scene.  All through the 
film, Barton stares into a representation of possibly the lowest form
of art: a hotel painting.  In the end, he finds himself a part of that
picture: Barton's life imitating the lowest form of art.  The Coens 
turn one of the most pretentious and self-serving forms of art, the 
autobiography, on its head by showing the exact opposite happen.
Finally, as for Joyce, the final scenes of Barton Fink at the beach,
link in beautifully with the final scenes of James Joyce's autobiographical 
Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man, which paints a very similar scenario.
It's a very apt, circular, reference.
All of this is in my humble opinion, of course -- I wouldn't be pretentious
enough to try and speak for whatever it is rattling around inside the
Coen's collective heads.  However, in response to the original comment, I 
would hope the above interpretations would be considered strong enough to 
dispel the notion that the symbolism in Barton Fink is "meaningless", when
it's really a very intricately structured story.
Anyway, I've spouted off enough tonight.  I'll shut up now. 
esch@fische.com               
(Eschatfische.) --------------------------------- http://www.fische.com

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
CONTACT and CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT couldn't have come from more different 
places: CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT being a low-budget French film and CONTACT a
big-budget Hollywood picture full of CGI special effects.  However, they both 
derive their themes from the same part of human life; overcoming a sense of 
loneliness, and making contact with the world around one's self.  
I had heard of CONTACT's opening scene before ever stepping foot in the 
theater: friends and posters were shocked by it's "silent" opening.  Hardly 
was the opening silent, however: I was surrounded (literally) with radio 
broadcasts.  Considering the nature of the film, and the emphasis on radio 
throughout Contact's opening sequence and early scenes, I had hoped to find 
that Robert Zemeckis (director of Forrest Gump), had found a counterpoint to 
his prior, feel-good hit: instead of a simple man finding others through his 
simplicity, a smart woman would discover the loneliness that is tantamount to 
(and a natural part of) life in the universe -- a loneliness that can be 
especially strong for a nonbeliever in an ever-present spiritual force, a God. 
As the camera pulled back and the sounds traveled back in time to silence... 
brought back to a scene of young Ellie (Jena Malone, later played by Jodie
Foster) DXing with her transmitter, attempting to make contact across the 
country... I had thought that the movie would be able to express such a thing.
There is possibly no more lonely experience in life than working with a radio 
transmitter to find broadcasts from far off.  One is likely to find nothing 
but static, strange impulses of electricity and natural elements manifest as 
sound -- or, if one is lucky, one may be able to listen to a broadcast in a 
foreign language, the mechanical drones of a "numbers station" (information 
broadcast in numerical code, most likely by spies, that is typically jammed by 
metallic droning noises) or a data transmission, personified by its bleeping 
carrier tone.  Most often, however, one will find the person on the other 
end a preacher, haranguing the unseen masses (of whom the lone DXer may be the 
only audience) about the interpretation of a bible passage.  Ellie finds a 
fellow DXer in Pensacola, Florida, however... of whom she asks about the 
weather. 
Working with a shortwave radio late at night suffuses the DXer with an 
impenetrable sense of eeriness: knowing that there are signals literally 
surrounding one's own body, but often not being able to find a broadcast of 
pertinence... or worse, finding one that is incomprehensible.  Such must have 
been the motivations of writer Carl Sagan's when developing the original story 
of CONTACT... the dream of coming into contact with extraterrestrial life 
filtered through both the unlikeliness of establishing that contact, and the 
type of contact that could be made.  So how can it be, then, that Zemeckis 
encodes his film with the much more common, banal message of those late-
night radio preachers?
The character of Palmer Joss provides the answer.  Giving the role to Matthew 
McConaughey, Zemeckis attempts to balance Ellie's sterile, scientific lack of 
belief with a sexy preacher man, one who would be a man of a cloth if it 
weren't for that darn celibacy requirement.  Throughout the film, Palmer and 
Ellie quarrel about the existence of God and the importance of that argument 
to one's life, the two bound by a furtive sexual encounter at the beginning of 
the film... until finally, in the closing scenes, Ellie finds her faith: 
through science, she has reached contact with an alien being, and finds 
herself comforted by the knowledge that there is life beyond that of 
Earth...not at all unlike the comfort that Palmer finds in his belief in God.  
The audience leaves the theaters affirmed that no matter which path they take, 
they can always find solace in the knowledge that there is something greater 
which is there to protect them, something that has been there for millions of 
years.
This is an unfairly stacked deck, however -- Ellie's emotions are being 
filtered through an alien encounter that is as maudlin as it is absurd.  
Zemeckis isn't content having Ellie come into contact with another form of 
life, but a form of life that takes its form as her lost father.  
This dumbing-down of the loneliness of the human condition, amplified by a 
plot device as crude as the drug-smugglers of a standard action film or best 
friend gone bad of your average thriller is a great insult to the audience's 
intelligence.  When Ellie finds the alien, all the alien can tell her is that 
the weather's just fine on Vega... a pitiful and bathetic ending to what could 
have been an incisive commentary of the complexities of communication between 
not only different forms of life, but also between other cultures or between 
human beings of the same background.  To the movie's credit, the script brings 
up some fascinating issues, and Jodie Foster gets bonus points for playing
an atheist... but the answer to the problem of loneliness, whether existential 
or practical, isn't talking about the weather -- and it's an insult to the 
insights and extraterrestrial longings of Carl Sagan for the movie to put such 
a feel-good gloss on that questions that the film raises.
CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT (given the much less alliterative title WHEN THE CAT'S 
AWAY in the United States) has a much similar solution to the problem of 
loneliness, but is ultimately much more honest in its end.  Chloe (Garance 
Clavel), a makeup artist working in the Bastille sector of modern Paris, lives 
with her male roommate and his latest flames.  Other than doing touch-up jobs 
on pouting primadonnas and laying on the couch with her cat Gris-gris, Chloe 
doesn't have much of her life.  
Chloe leaves Gris-gris with Madame Renee, a semi-professional cat-watcher 
(played by Madame Renee, a real-life semi-professional cat-watcher) in the 
neighborhood while she goes on vacation (which takes up a genuinely hilarious 
10 seconds of screen time) only to find Gris-gris missing when she returns.  
The search for her cat forces her to leave the apartment to find her cat, 
finding a network of old ladies, a sweet Arab named Djamel (Zinedine Soualem) 
who helps her find her cat, the individual who provides many of the movie's 
scenes with a wonderfully inappropriate backbeat (Romain Duris) and pretty 
much the rest of the neighborhood.  
The standout scenes in CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT are the ones which succinctly 
but hilariously outline the slow banality of Chloe's life.  In one sequence, 
she and a friend (Flo, played by Estelle Larrivaz) look frantically around 
themselves while seated on chairs in the modeling studio, segueing directly 
into a shot of Chloe at the Laundromat, looking sadly beyond the camera while 
pounding rave music plays in the background.  In another, she shares a 
wonderfully boring breakfast with her roommate's new boyfriend which concludes 
with her roommate's boyfriend asking her, longingly, if she'll be back later.  
In CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT, Paris is fraught with minor dangers: Chloe 
puts on a nice dress to attract a suitor and is accosted by creepy men, the 
local barmaid hits on her, a lovely old building is demolished while the 
Bastille's residents look on with confusion, an old lady nonchalantly talks to 
her husband's ashes to Chloe's astonishment, a sexual encounter is aborted by 
a phone call.  Chloe seems to recess into her shell more and more with each 
encounter.
In the end, Chloe finds her happiness in life... but it is one based on a lie, 
and one much to the chagrin of Djamel, who one suspects could truly put an end 
to Chloe's loneliness.  In the end, with the film's most talked-about shot,
the audience is led to believe that Chloe has found herself... but the truth 
is, she was never truly lost.
The banality of the images earlier in the film reveal a certain beauty, not 
unlike the vast silent pullback of CONTACT's opening shot... the images of 
inaction and loneliness hold a sense of wonder curiously lacking from the 
relatively obvious and traditional conclusions of both films. As such, both 
films have beautiful and promising beginnings that belie their tepid 
resolutions.  Djamel's last words, as he sits in a local bar surrounded by 
people but close to no-one -- and not for lack of trying -- end up being the 
most true of anything said in either film.  
Dave Cowen (esch@fische.com)
Eschatfische. --------------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for Grace of My Heart (1996)
Just into the second act of GRACE OF MY HEART came a disarming moment
which I was never quite able to recover from.  Up until that moment
the casting of the film was contemporary and vibrant: John Turturro
and Eric Stoltz give hilariously fast-talking performances, while 
Bridget Fonda steals the show as a disturbed Lesley Gore.  However, 
after seeing punkers Redd Cross strike Gen-X poses over Matt Dillon 
and leer at a theremin player making horrible noise during a failed 
studio session modeled after the Beach Boys' sessions while producing 
the never-released _Smile_, I knew that I couldn't quite trust the 
film any longer.
In GRACE OF MY HEART, Illeana Douglas plays Edna Buxton, a "willful"
young woman who swaps dresses and musical numbers at the last minute 
in order to wow the crowd at a talent audition, finding herself the 
winner of a recording contract in New York.  That recording contract
never comes, and Edna finds herself destitute in New York.  A crying
fit at an audition nets her a lunch meeting with nice hebrew boy
Joel Millner, played by John Turturro as if he were the Barton Fink
of the music business, who convinces her to change her name and become
a songwriter.  The film follows Edna, loosely modeled on Carol King, 
through two decades of hits, misses, and her three failed relationships 
with industry insiders.  
Director Allison Anders literally races through the first half of the 
film, favoring distracting jump cuts between lines of dialogue and 
quick montages to lay out Edna's rise as one of the premier 
songwriters of the Brill Building era.  First encounters with Turturro, 
Eric Stoltz's Howard Cazsatt and Bridget Fonda's Kelly Porter border on 
the berzerk, bringing the film an endearing manic quality.  The use of 
original music, written by the likes of Los Lobos and Elvis Costello, 
saves this first half of the film from the kind of false sentimentality 
that usually grounds films similar to GRACE in nature.
After speeding through a brief relationship with a timid DJ, played by 
Bruce Davison, GRACE OF MY HEART takes a left turn when Matt Dillon's
character Jay Phillips is introduced.  Dillon brings to his character
a deliberately dazed impression of Beach Boys leader/producer Brian 
Wilson.  Dillon gets the carefully studied mannerisms and motions
right, but ultimately seems out of place in the part -- his teen idol 
reputation obscures the boyish quality that the real Brian Wilson
always seems to exhibit.  The film strikes an eerie note as Phillips
and Buxton marry: while Dillon's Brian Wilson may not be entirely
convincing, Illeana Douglas is a dead ringer for Wilson's real-life 
ex-wife, Marilyn.
The pace of the film slows as it portrays Phillip's descent into 
paranoia and isolation.  As an exploration of the downfall of 
Brian Wilson and the Beach Boys, the film provides a fascinating 
portrait -- but as the film shifts focus from Edna to Jay, it begins
to lose the emotional bond that the audience had created with Edna.  
At the end of the second act, an acceptably accurate portrayal of 
Brian Wilson's life is completely invalidated by a drastic action, 
and the film's tone switches again.
As followers of the Beach Boys know, Brian Wilson began to live his
life in bed, gaining weight hundreds of pounds over his normal size
and isolating his wife.  Earlier in the second act, Edna explains 
to rival songwriter Cheryl that she would stay with Brian no matter
how far he descended into madness.  In real life, that ended up in
years of isolation for Wilson's wife, and an eventual break-up --
and I had completely assumed that the plot would continue to follow
Wilson's life into order to make an ironic point about Edna's 
useless relations with men.  However. instead of continuing to use
Wilson's life as a drive for the film, Anders forcibly steers the 
script away from the Phillips character in order to finish the film 
with an ending which paints a much more rosy picture of Edna's life
than would seem necessary.
Throughout the first two acts, GRACE OF MY HEART is an invigorating
film: and unlike many other viewers who have found the second act
to be tedious, I was perfectly happy to accept the change in tone 
between the first and second acts, possibly out of my personal 
interest in Brian Wilson's life.  In the final minutes of the film, 
however, Anders drops both the manic energy of the first half and
the biographical portrait of the second in favor of Hollywood-style 
schmaltz.
As much as the film has extremely glaring faults, I do have to 
recommend it.  There's a lot to like in the film: Turturro fills
his scenes with charm, and Douglas is positively radiant.  Only 
the poor editing of the first half, where Anders compresses time 
to a ridiculous extent (in one scene, Anders doesn't even give Edna 
three seconds to walk over and greet a character, instead cutting 
directly to their embrace) and the distressingly commercial finale 
lowers my impression of the film.  At the very least, fans of Brian 
Wilson should get a tremendous kick out of Dillon's maligned
impression -- and fans of the music of the 50's and early 60's 
should be very pleased by the original music..
Dave Cowen (esch@fische.com)
Eschatfische. -------------------------------- http://www.fische.com

Title
Review for Trees Lounge (1996)
Tommy (Steve Buscemi) lives directly over the Trees Lounge, a local
bar like any other local bar.  He shares the counter with Bill
(Bronson Dudley), an old timer who keeps a pile of bills on the
bar to keep the drinks coming.  When he's not drinking, he's 
stalking Rob (Anthony LaPaglia) who stole Tommy's girlfriend 
Theresa (Elizabeth Bracco) after Tommy stole 1500 dollars of his
money.  Tommy's a mechanic with a car that doesn't run, so his job 
prospects are pretty slim.  Ultimately, he gets a job working as 
a Good Humor man after his Uncle Al (Seymour Cassel) who used to
drive the truck dies.  As he runs his route, Theresa's 17 year old
niece Debbie (Chloe Sevigny) hops on board to smoke and run the 
route with him, and as they grow closer, Tommy's life starts falling
apart.
The scenes between Tommy and Chloe have a genuine chemistry: a 
mascara-drenched Sevigny plays her lolita-esque part just right,
Buscemi's Tommy can be genuinely funny in a resigned and awkward 
way, and the scenes between those two are by far the best in the film.
Unfortunately, the film jumps from focusing on Tommy to the 
relationships between Rob and Theresa, Theresa's sister and her 
husband, and a relationship between bar regular Mike and his wife 
Marie.  These scenes are handled with all the wit and care of a 
sitcom, and the acting and writing in these scenes are sub-par at 
best.  The  movie only seems interesting or even genuine when 
Tommy and Chloe are on the screen, and that's just a quarter of 
the film.  
Strangely, the final shot of the film is one of the best I've 
seen -- a slow motion shot of Buscemi's face slowly and subtly 
contorting into expressions of confusion, derision and contempt -- 
a shot which unfortunately belies the nature of the rest of the
film.  TREES LOUNGE doesn't seem to know whether it wants to be
bleak or a comedy.  Most of the time it's a rather conventional and
uninteresting comedy.  Buscemi's film would have been much better off 
should he had settled on bleak.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
The fact that this film's own promotional materials and private
reviews provide almost constant comparisons to PULP FICTION didn't 
keep me away from 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY is pretty sad: a comparison 
with PULP FICTION is nearly as much a kiss of death these days as 
knowing that a film was not shown to critics for review.  Perhaps 
MGM was trying to recreate the promotion of GET SHORTY, a tepid film 
that through the constant comparison of Elmore Leonard's dialogue 
with Tarantino, along with the presence of the ubiquitous John 
Travolta, made the film a commercial success.  The only link that 
2 DAYS has with Pulp Fiction is that there are small-time gangsters, 
and occasionally those gangsters do funny things.  To that end, I
offer my own comparison: "It's like PULP FICTION with PRATFALLS!"
James Spader plays hit man Lee Woods, a man obsessed with a single
unit of time, and who, with the help of Swedish sex bomb Helga 
Svelgen (Charlize Theron) and small-time thug Dosmo Pizzo
(Danny Aiello) murder the ex-husband of Becky Foxx (Teri Hatcher).
Soon after, an unsuccessful writer/director (Paul Mazursky), a 
snobbish art-dealer (Greg Cruttwell), and a homicide-department 
wannabe (Eric Stoltz) fall into the mix.  
What grounds 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY is the mistaken sense of 
sentimentality it presents: director/writer John Herzfield tries
to evoke as much sympathy for these characters in as broad a manner
as possible -- Mazursky's suicidal writer can't bring himself to 
kill himself because of the stares of his lovable dog, Aiello's 
small-time thug also happens to be a great cook, Stoltz's character
doesn't want to bust a massage parlor because of his affection for
one of the massage-girls.  Too many scenes play as being ridiculously
maudlin: the characters are those good-hearted sensitive types who
get things wrong at first but redeem themselves at the end.  You
know the kind of character I'm talking about -- and if you're like 
me, you've never met one in real life.
Not only has this film been compared with PULP FICTION, but also 
Robert Altman's SHORT CUTS.  While Short Cuts offers an entirely
unsentimental look at the same community -- offering a glimpse into
the lives of real people and the way they are interconnected and
then cutting off from them without resolution -- 2 DAYS is compelled
like a bad TV movie to wrap everything up neatly in the last 
few frames.  The good guys win, the bad guys lose, everyone gets 
over their neuroses by carrying around guns and dropping their 
hairpieces for two days.
The film isn't entirely irredeemable, however: Greg Cruttwell's 
performance is lifted directly from his performance as the 
overpowering, abusive Jeremy in Mike Leigh's Naked, and his 
over-the-top histrionics are a lot of fun throughout the first
half of the film.  Ultimately, though, the schtick is played for 
too long and his character is dumped violently from the script by 
the end of the movie.  Also suddenly dumped, puzzlingly, is the 
partner to Eric Stoltz's character... who leaves the story in a 
strangely unsympathetic way. 
Throughout the film, the Mazursky character talks about his film
"Lights Out", which was supposed to be a drama, but then suddenly
introduced an elephant into the mix for comedy.  The pratfalls in
this film seem equally overwheming: the comedy doesn't blend with
the rest of the film.  Amazingly, the comedy is not the kind of 
smirking Gen-X pop-culture humor we see so much of these days... it's
actually worse!  It's bonafide physical humor lifted from a million
bad films from the 50's, with double-takes, mistaken identities,
crazy animals, and every other old trick in the book.  Some of it 
works: Danny Aiello goes "UHHHH!" and almost shoots a sculpture of a 
dog with the face of Greg Cruttwell's character when entering a room.
Most of the rest of the comedy is, amazingly enough, much more broad
and little of it works at all.  Did I mention Danny Aiello's 
hairpiece keeps falling off?
It's not PULP FICTION, and it's not SHORT CUTS -- and it's nowhere 
near the calibre of those two films.  It's really pretty bad.  I 
wanted to give up long before these 2 DAYS were over.
